Oklahoma, session 2025, SB50.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 1357, as
last amended by Section 4, Chapter 363, O.S.L. 2024 (68 O.S. Supp.
2024, Section 1357), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1357. Exemptions – General. There are hereby
specifically exempted from the tax levied by the Oklahoma Sales Tax
Code:
1. Transportation of school pupils to and from elementary
schools or high schools in motor or other vehicles;
2. Transportation of persons where the fare of each person does
not exceed One Dollar ($1.00), or local transportation of persons
within the corporate limits of a municipality except by taxicabs;

3. Sales for resale to persons engaged in the business of
reselling the articles purchased, whether within or without the
state, provided that such sales to residents of this state are made
to persons to whom sales tax permits have been issued as provided in
the Oklahoma Sales Tax Code. This exemption shall not apply to the
sales of articles made to persons holding permits when such persons
purchase items for their use and which they are not regularly
engaged in the business of reselling; neither shall this exemption
apply to sales of tangible personal property to peddlers, solicitors
and other salespersons who do not have an established place of
business and a sales tax permit. The exemption provided by this
paragraph shall apply to sales of motor fuel or diesel fuel to a
Group Five vendor, but the use of such motor fuel or diesel fuel by
the Group Five vendor shall not be exempt from the tax levied by the
Oklahoma Sales Tax Code. The purchase of motor fuel or diesel fuel
is exempt from sales tax when the motor fuel is for shipment outside
this state and consumed by a common carrier by rail in the conduct
of its business. The sales tax shall apply to the purchase of motor
fuel or diesel fuel in Oklahoma by a common carrier by rail when
such motor fuel is purchased for fueling, within this state, of any
locomotive or other motorized flanged wheel equipment;
4. Sales of advertising space in newspapers and periodicals;
5. Sales of programs relating to sporting and entertainment
events, and sales of advertising on billboards (including signage,
posters, panels, marquees or on other similar surfaces, whether
indoors or outdoors) or in programs relating to sporting and
entertainment events, and sales of any advertising, to be displayed
at or in connection with a sporting event, via the Internet,
electronic display devices or through public address or broadcast
systems. The exemption authorized by this paragraph shall be
effective for all sales made on or after January 1, 2001;
6. Sales of any advertising, other than the advertising
described by paragraph 5 of this section, via the Internet,
electronic display devices or through the electronic media including
radio, public address or broadcast systems, television (whether
through closed circuit broadcasting systems or otherwise), and cable
and satellite television, and the servicing of any advertising
devices;
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 2

7. Eggs, feed, supplies, machinery, and equipment purchased by
persons regularly engaged in the business of raising worms, fish,
any insect, or any other form of terrestrial or aquatic animal life
and used for the purpose of raising same for marketing. This
exemption shall only be granted and extended to the purchaser when
the items are to be used and in fact are used in the raising of
animal life as set out above. Each purchaser shall certify, in
writing, on the invoice or sales ticket retained by the vendor that
the purchaser is regularly engaged in the business of raising such
animal life and that the items purchased will be used only in such
business. The vendor shall certify to the Oklahoma Tax Commission
that the price of the items has been reduced to grant the full
benefit of the exemption. Violation hereof by the purchaser or
vendor shall be a misdemeanor;
8. Sale of natural or artificial gas and electricity, and
associated delivery or transmission services, when sold exclusively
for residential use. Provided, this exemption shall not apply to
any sales tax levied by a city or town, or a county or any other
jurisdiction in this state;
9. In addition to the exemptions authorized by Section 1357.6
of this title, sales of drugs sold pursuant to a prescription
written for the treatment of human beings by a person licensed to
prescribe the drugs, and sales of insulin and medical oxygen.
Provided, this exemption shall not apply to over-the-counter drugs;
10. Transfers of title or possession of empty, partially
filled, or filled returnable oil and chemical drums to any person
who is not regularly engaged in the business of selling, reselling
or otherwise transferring empty, partially filled or filled
returnable oil drums;
11. Sales of one-way utensils, paper napkins, paper cups,
disposable hot containers, and other one-way carry out materials to
a vendor of meals or beverages;
12. Sales of food or food products for home consumption which
are purchased in whole or in part with coupons issued pursuant to
the federal food stamp program as authorized by Sections 2011
through 2029 2036d of Title 7 of the United States Code, as to that
portion purchased with such coupons. The exemption provided for
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 3

such sales shall be inapplicable to such sales upon the effective
date of any federal law that removes the requirement of the
exemption as a condition for participation by the state in the
federal food stamp program;
13. Sales of food or food products, or any equipment or
supplies used in the preparation of the food or food products to or
by an organization which:
a. is exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of
Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), and
which provides and delivers prepared meals for home
consumption to elderly or homebound persons as part of
a program commonly known as “Meals on Wheels” or
“Mobile Meals”, or
b. is exempt from taxation pursuant to the provisions of
Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of
1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), and
which receives federal funding pursuant to the Older
Americans Act of 1965, as amended, for the purpose of
providing nutrition programs for the care and benefit
of elderly persons;
14. a. Sales of tangible personal property or services to or
by organizations which are exempt from taxation
pursuant to the provisions of Section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C.,
Section 501(c)(3), and:
(1) are primarily involved in the collection and
distribution of food and other household products
to other organizations that facilitate the
distribution of such products to the needy and
such distributee organizations are exempt from
taxation pursuant to the provisions of Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3), or
(2) facilitate the distribution of such products to
the needy.
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 4

b. Sales made in the course of business for profit or
savings, competing with other persons engaged in the
same or similar business shall not be exempt under
this paragraph;
15. Sales of tangible personal property or services to
children’s homes which are located on church-owned property and are
operated by organizations exempt from taxation pursuant to the
provisions of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, 26
U.S.C., Section 501(c)(3);
16. Sales of computers, data processing equipment, related
peripherals, and telephone, telegraph or telecommunications service
and equipment for use in a qualified aircraft maintenance or
manufacturing facility. For purposes of this paragraph, “qualified
aircraft maintenance or manufacturing facility” means a new or
expanding facility primarily engaged in aircraft repair, building or
rebuilding, whether or not on a factory basis, whose total cost of
construction exceeds the sum of Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00)
and which employs at least two hundred fifty (250) new full-time-
equivalent employees, as certified by the Oklahoma Employment
Security Commission, upon completion of the facility. In order to
qualify for the exemption provided for by this paragraph, the cost
of the items purchased by the qualified aircraft maintenance or
manufacturing facility shall equal or exceed the sum of Two Million
Dollars ($2,000,000.00);
17. Sales of tangible personal property consumed or
incorporated in the construction or expansion of a qualified
aircraft maintenance or manufacturing facility as defined in
paragraph 16 of this section. For purposes of this paragraph, sales
made to a contractor or subcontractor that has previously entered
into a contractual relationship with a qualified aircraft
maintenance or manufacturing facility for construction or expansion
of such a facility shall be considered sales made to a qualified
aircraft maintenance or manufacturing facility;
18. Sales of the following telecommunications services:
a. Interstate interstate and International “800 service”
international 800 service. “800 service” means a
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 5

telecommunications service that allows a caller to
dial a toll-free number without incurring a charge for
the call. The service is typically marketed under the
name “800”, “855”, “866”, “877” and “888” toll-free
calling, and any subsequent numbers designated by the
Federal Communications Commission,
b. Interstate interstate and International “900 service”
international 900 service. “900 service” means an
inbound toll telecommunications service purchased by a
subscriber that allows the subscriber’s customers to
call in to the subscriber’s prerecorded announcement
or live service. 900 service does not include the
charge for: collection services provided by the
seller of the telecommunications services to the
subscriber, or service or product sold by the
subscriber to the subscriber’s customer. The service
is typically marketed under the name “900” service,
and any subsequent numbers designated by the Federal
Communications Commission,
c. Interstate interstate and International “private
communications service” international private
communications service. “Private communications
service” means a telecommunications service that
entitles the customer to exclusive or priority use of
a communications channel or group of channels between
or among termination points, regardless of the manner
in which such channel or channels are connected, and
includes switching capacity, extension lines, stations
and any other associated services that are provided in
connection with the use of such channel or channels,
d. “Value-added nonvoice data service” value-added
nonvoice data service. “Value-added nonvoice data
service” means a service that otherwise meets the
definition of telecommunications services in which
computer processing applications are used to act on
the form, content, code or protocol of the information
or data primarily for a purpose other than
transmission, conveyance, or routing,
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 6

e. Interstate interstate and International international
telecommunications service which is:
(1) rendered by a company for private use within its
organization, or
(2) used, allocated or distributed by a company to
its affiliated group,
f. Regulatory regulatory assessments and charges
including charges to fund the Oklahoma Universal
Service Fund, the Oklahoma Lifeline Fund and the
Oklahoma High Cost Fund, and
g. Telecommunications telecommunications nonrecurring
charges including but not limited to the installation,
connection, change, or initiation of
telecommunications services which are not associated
with a retail consumer sale;
19. Sales of railroad track spikes manufactured and sold for
use in this state in the construction or repair of railroad tracks,
switches, sidings, and turnouts;
20. Sales of aircraft and aircraft parts provided such sales
occur at a qualified aircraft maintenance facility. As used in this
paragraph, “qualified aircraft maintenance facility” means a
facility operated by an air common carrier including one or more
component overhaul support buildings or structures in an area owned,
leased, or controlled by the air common carrier, at which there were
employed at least two thousand (2,000) full-time-equivalent
employees in the preceding year as certified by the Oklahoma
Employment Security Commission and which is primarily related to the
fabrication, repair, alteration, modification, refurbishing,
maintenance, building, or rebuilding of commercial aircraft or
aircraft parts used in air common carriage. For purposes of this
paragraph, “air common carrier” shall also include members of an
affiliated group as defined by Section 1504 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, 26 U.S.C., Section 1504. Beginning July
1, 2012, the exemption shall include sales of machinery, tools,
supplies, equipment, and related tangible personal property and
services used or consumed in the repair, remodeling, or maintenance
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 7

of aircraft, aircraft engines or aircraft component parts which
occur at a qualified aircraft maintenance facility;
21. Sales of machinery and equipment purchased and used by
persons and establishments primarily engaged in computer services
and data processing:
a. as defined under Industry Group Numbers 7372 and 7373
of the Standard Industrial Classification (SIC)
Manual, latest version, which derive at least fifty
percent (50%) of their annual gross revenues from the
sale of a product or service to an out-of-state buyer
or consumer, and
b. as defined under Industry Group Number 7374 of the SIC
Manual, latest version, which derive at least eighty
percent (80%) of their annual gross revenues from the
sale of a product or service to an out-of-state buyer
or consumer.
Eligibility for the exemption set out in this paragraph shall be
established, subject to review by the Tax Commission, by annually
filing an affidavit with the Tax Commission stating that the
facility so qualifies and such information as required by the Tax
Commission. For purposes of determining whether annual gross
revenues are derived from sales to out-of-state buyers or consumers,
all sales to the federal government shall be considered to be to an
out-of-state buyer or consumer;
22. Sales of prosthetic devices to an individual for use by
such individual. For purposes of this paragraph, “prosthetic
device” shall have the same meaning as provided in Section 1357.6 of
this title, but shall not include corrective eye glasses, contact
lenses, or hearing aids;
23. Sales of tangible personal property or services to a motion
picture or television production company to be used or consumed in
connection with an eligible production. For purposes of this
paragraph, “eligible production” means a documentary, special, music
video or a television commercial or television program that will
serve as a pilot for or be a segment of an ongoing dramatic or
situation comedy series filmed or taped for network or national or
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 8

regional syndication or a feature-length motion picture intended for
theatrical release or for network or national or regional
syndication or broadcast. The provisions of this paragraph shall
apply to sales occurring on or after July 1, 1996. In order to
qualify for the exemption, the motion picture or television
production company shall file any documentation and information
required to be submitted pursuant to rules promulgated by the Tax
Commission;
24. Sales of diesel fuel sold for consumption by commercial
vessels, barges and other commercial watercraft;
25. Sales of tangible personal property or services to tax-
exempt independent nonprofit biomedical research foundations that
provide educational programs for Oklahoma science students and
teachers and to tax-exempt independent nonprofit community blood
banks headquartered in this state;
26. Effective May 6, 1992, sales of wireless telecommunications
equipment to a vendor who subsequently transfers the equipment at no
charge or for a discounted charge to a consumer as part of a
promotional package or as an inducement to commence or continue a
contract for wireless telecommunications services;
27. Effective January 1, 1991, leases of rail transportation
cars to haul coal to coal-fired plants located in this state which
generate electric power;
28. Beginning July 1, 2005, sales of aircraft engine repairs,
modification, and replacement parts, sales of aircraft frame repairs
and modification, aircraft interior modification, and paint, and
sales of services employed in the repair, modification, and
replacement of parts of aircraft engines, aircraft frame and
interior repair and modification, and paint;
29. Sales of materials and supplies to the owner or operator of
a ship, motor vessel, or barge that is used in interstate or
international commerce if the materials and supplies:
a. are loaded on the ship, motor vessel, or barge and
used in the maintenance and operation of the ship,
motor vessel, or barge, or
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 9

b. enter into and become component parts of the ship,
motor vessel, or barge;
30. Sales of tangible personal property made at estate sales at
which such property is offered for sale on the premises of the
former residence of the decedent by a person who is not required to
be licensed pursuant to the Transient Merchant Licensing Act, or who
is not otherwise required to obtain a sales tax permit for the sale
of such property pursuant to the provisions of Section 1364 of this
title; provided:
a. such sale or event may not be held for a period
exceeding three (3) consecutive days,
b. the sale must be conducted within six (6) months of
the date of death of the decedent, and
c. the exemption allowed by this paragraph shall not be
allowed for property that was not part of the
decedent’s estate;
31. Beginning January 1, 2004, sales of electricity and
associated delivery and transmission services, when sold exclusively
for use by an oil and gas operator for reservoir dewatering projects
and associated operations commencing on or after July 1, 2003, in
which the initial water-to-oil ratio is greater than or equal to
five-to-one water-to-oil, and such oil and gas development projects
have been classified by the Corporation Commission as a reservoir
dewatering unit;
32. Sales of prewritten computer software that is delivered
electronically. For purposes of this paragraph, “delivered
electronically” means delivered to the purchaser by means other than
tangible storage media;
33. Sales of modular dwelling units when built at a production
facility and moved in whole or in parts, to be assembled on-site,
and permanently affixed to the real property and used for
residential or commercial purposes. The exemption provided by this
paragraph shall equal forty-five percent (45%) of the total sales
price of the modular dwelling unit. For purposes of this paragraph,
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 10

“modular dwelling unit” means a structure that is not subject to the
motor vehicle excise tax imposed pursuant to Section 2103 of this
title;
34. Sales of tangible personal property or services to:
a. persons who are residents of Oklahoma and have been
honorably discharged from active service in any branch
of the Armed Forces of the United States or Oklahoma
National Guard and who have been certified by the
United States Department of Veterans Affairs or its
successor to be in receipt of disability compensation
at the one-hundred-percent rate and the disability
shall be permanent and have been sustained through
military action or accident or resulting from disease
contracted while in such active service and registered
with the veterans registry created by the Oklahoma
Department of Veterans Affairs, or
b. the surviving spouse of the person in subparagraph a
of this paragraph if the person is deceased and the
spouse has not remarried and the surviving spouse of a
person who is determined by the United States
Department of Defense or any branch of the United
States military to have died while in the line of duty
if the spouse has not remarried. Sales for the
benefit of an eligible person to a spouse of the
eligible person or to a member of the household in
which the eligible person resides and who is
authorized to make purchases on the person’s behalf,
when such eligible person is not present at the sale,
shall also be exempt for purposes of this paragraph.
The Oklahoma Tax Commission shall issue a separate
exemption card to a spouse of an eligible person or to
a member of the household in which the eligible person
resides who is authorized to make purchases on the
person’s behalf, if requested by the eligible person.
Sales qualifying for the exemption authorized by this
paragraph shall not exceed Twenty-five Thousand
Dollars ($25,000.00) per year per individual while the
disabled veteran is living. Sales qualifying for the
exemption authorized by this paragraph shall not
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 11

exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per year for
an unremarried surviving spouse. Upon request of the
Tax Commission, a person asserting or claiming the
exemption authorized by this paragraph shall provide a
statement, executed under oath, that the total sales
amounts for which the exemption is applicable have not
exceeded Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) per
year per living disabled veteran or One Thousand
Dollars ($1,000.00) per year for an unremarried
surviving spouse. If the amount of such exempt sales
exceeds such amount, the sales tax in excess of the
authorized amount shall be treated as a direct sales
tax liability and may be recovered by the Tax
Commission in the same manner provided by law for
other taxes including penalty and interest. The Tax
Commission shall promulgate any rules necessary to
implement the provisions of this paragraph, which
shall include rules providing for the disclosure of
information about persons eligible for the exemption
authorized in this paragraph to the Oklahoma
Department of Veterans Affairs, as authorized in
Section 205 of this title. For purposes of the
exemption authorized by this subparagraph, if the
disability determination that would have been made
while the disabled veteran was still living is not
made final until after the death of the disabled
veteran, the exemption authorized by this subparagraph
may still be claimed by the surviving spouse;
35. Sales of electricity to the operator, specifically
designated by the Corporation Commission, of a spacing unit or lease
from which oil is produced or attempted to be produced using
enhanced recovery methods including, but not limited to, increased
pressure in a producing formation through the use of water or
saltwater if the electrical usage is associated with and necessary
for the operation of equipment required to inject or circulate
fluids in a producing formation for the purpose of forcing oil or
petroleum into a wellbore for eventual recovery and production from
the wellhead. In order to be eligible for the sales tax exemption
authorized by this paragraph, the total content of oil recovered
after the use of enhanced recovery methods shall not exceed one
percent (1%) by volume. The exemption authorized by this paragraph
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 12

shall be applicable only to the state sales tax rate and shall not
be applicable to any county or municipal sales tax rate;
36. Sales of intrastate charter and tour bus transportation.
As used in this paragraph, “intrastate charter and tour bus
transportation” means the transportation of persons from one
location in this state to another location in this state in a motor
vehicle which has been constructed in such a manner that it may
lawfully carry more than eighteen persons, and which is ordinarily
used or rented to carry persons for compensation. Provided, this
exemption shall not apply to regularly scheduled bus transportation
for the general public;
37. Sales of vitamins, minerals, and dietary supplements by a
licensed chiropractor to a person who is the patient of such
chiropractor at the physical location where the chiropractor
provides chiropractic care or services to such patient. The
provisions of this paragraph shall not be applicable to any drug,
medicine, or substance for which a prescription by a licensed
physician is required;
38. Sales of goods, wares, merchandise, tangible personal
property, machinery, and equipment to a web search portal located in
this state which derives at least eighty percent (80%) of its annual
gross revenue from the sale of a product or service to an out-of-
state buyer or consumer. For purposes of this paragraph, “web
search portal” means an establishment classified under NAICS North
American Industry Classification System (NAICS) code 519130 which
operates websites that use a search engine to generate and maintain
extensive databases of Internet addresses and content in an easily
searchable format;
39. Sales of tangible personal property consumed or
incorporated in the construction or expansion of a facility for a
corporation organized under Section 437 et seq. of Title 18 of the
Oklahoma Statutes as a rural electric cooperative. For purposes of
this paragraph, sales made to a contractor or subcontractor that has
previously entered into a contractual relationship with a rural
electric cooperative for construction or expansion of a facility
shall be considered sales made to a rural electric cooperative;
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 13

40. Sales of tangible personal property or services to a
business primarily engaged in the repair of consumer electronic
goods including, but not limited to, cell phones, compact disc
players, personal computers, MP3 players, digital devices for the
storage and retrieval of information through hard-wired or wireless
computer or Internet connections, if the devices are sold to the
business by the original manufacturer of such devices and the
devices are repaired, refitted or refurbished for sale by the entity
qualifying for the exemption authorized by this paragraph directly
to retail consumers or if the devices are sold to another business
entity for sale to retail consumers;
41. On or after July 1, 2019, and prior to July 1, 2024, sales
or leases of rolling stock when sold or leased by the manufacturer,
regardless of whether the purchaser is a public services corporation
engaged in business as a common carrier of property or passengers by
railway, for use or consumption by a common carrier directly in the
rendition of public service. For purposes of this paragraph,
“rolling stock” means locomotives, autocars, and railroad cars and
“sales or leases” includes railroad car maintenance and retrofitting
of railroad cars for their further use only on the railways;
42. Sales of gold, silver, platinum, palladium or other bullion
items such as coins and bars and legal tender of any nation, which
legal tender is sold according to its value as precious metal or as
an investment. As used in the paragraph, “bullion” means any
precious metal including, but not limited to, gold, silver,
platinum, and palladium, that is in such a state or condition that
its value depends upon its precious metal content and not its form.
The exemption authorized by this paragraph shall not apply to
fabricated metals that have been processed or manufactured for
artistic use or as jewelry; and
43. Recovery fees on the rental charge from any item of heavy
equipment property rental as provided for in Section 2 of this act
2807.11 of this title; and
44. Sales of firearm safety devices and gun safety devices. As
used in this paragraph:
a. “firearm safety device” means a gun safe, gun case,
gun lock box, trigger lock, barrel lock, or other
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 14

device that is designed to be used to store a firearm
and that is designed to be unlocked only by means of a
key, combination, or other similar means, and
b. “gun safety device” means any integral device to be
equipped or installed on a firearm that permits a user
to program the firearm to operate only for specified
persons designated by the user through computerized
locking devices or other means integral to and
permanently part of the firearm.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 15

Passed the Senate the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 22nd day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 50 Page 16